District of Columbia statutes.
7-751.16

Rulemaking.

The Mayor is authorized to promulgate rules necessary to implement this chapter.

History

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-71, § 17, 53 DCR 61

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority pursuant to DC Law 16-71, the District of Columbia Health Professional Recruitment Program Act of 2005, see Mayor’s Order 2009-176, October 13, 2009 ( 56 DCR 8480).